Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.020

Formation of district—How initiated.

County road improvement districts may be initiated either by resolution of the board of county commissioners or by petition signed by the owners according to the records of the office of the county auditor of property to an aggregate amount of the majority of the lineal frontage upon the contemplated improvement and of the area within the limits of the county road improvement district to be created therefor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.020. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 2.]